Hawaii statutes.
[§15D-11]
Declaration. A military-overseas ballot shall include or be accompanied by
a declaration or affirmation signed by the voter that a material misstatement
of fact in completing the ballot may be grounds for a conviction of perjury or
related offenses under the laws of the United States [or] this State. [L 2012,
c 226, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next